Hawaii statutes.
[§431:19-101.6] Salary. The salary of
the administrator shall be set by the director of commerce and consumer
affairs, but shall not be more than ninety-five per cent of the maximum salary
of the commissioner. [L 1997, c 261, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next